Ohio, session 136, HB255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 122.97, 122.971, and 122.972 of 4
the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 122.97. The Ohio sports commission is created within 6
the department of development. 7
The purpose of the commission is to enhance the quality of 8
life in this state through the attraction, promotion, and 9
development of national and international sports. The commission 10
shall partner and coordinate with convention and visitor 11
bureaus, chambers of commerce, municipal corporations, sports 12
organizations, venues, and appropriate stakeholders to attract 13
and host sporting events that enhance the state's economy and 14
image. 15
Sec. 122.971. (A) The board of commissioners of the Ohio 16
sports commission is created. The board shall do all of the 17
following: 18

H. B. No. 255 Page 2
As Introduced
(1) Study the promotion and development of sports tourism 19
in this state, with a view to fulfilling the purpose of the Ohio 20
sports commission under section 122.29 of the Revised Code; 21
(2) Partner and communicate with private and public 22
stakeholders to attract sports events to this state; 23
(3) Develop policy recommendations for the general 24
assembly, the governor, and local governments; 25
(4) Study the establishment of a new grant program to 26
support emerging sports economies throughout the state, 27
including a funding source for the program; 28
(5) Not later than six months after the effective date of 29
this section, issue a report of its findings and recommendations 30
to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of 31
the house of representatives. 32
(B) The board of commissioners of the Ohio sports 33
commission shall consist of the following seventeen members, and 34
the membership shall reflect the diversity of the state: 35
(1) The governor or the governor's designee; 36
(2) The director of development or the director's 37
designee; 38
(3) One member of the majority party of the senate 39
appointed by the president of the senate; 40
(4) One member of the minority party of the senate 41
appointed by the senate minority leader; 42
(5) One member of the majority party of the house of 43
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of 44
representatives; 45

H. B. No. 255 Page 3
As Introduced
(6) One member of the minority party of the house of 46
representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house of 47
representatives; 48
(7) One member of an organization in this state that 49
represents student athletes, appointed by the governor; 50
(8) One member of an organization in this state that 51
represents professional athletes, appointed by the governor; 52
(9) One member that represents convention and visitors' 53
bureaus in this state, appointed by the governor; 54
(10) Four members that represent local sports commissions 55
throughout the state, recommended by sports commissions 56
throughout the state, and appointed by the governor; 57
(11) Two members that represent private stakeholders in 58
the sports industry or tourism industries in this state, 59
appointed by the governor; 60
(12) Two members that represent athletes in this state, 61
appointed by the governor. 62
(C) Of the members appointed by the governor, six shall be 63
appointed to initial terms of two years, and five shall be 64
appointed to initial terms of four years. Thereafter, all 65
members appointed by the governor shall be appointed to terms of 66
four years. All members of the board appointed by the speaker 67
and minority leader of the house of representatives or the 68
president and minority leader of the senate shall be appointed 69
within thirty days after the commencement of the first regular 70
session of each general assembly, and shall serve until the 71
expiration of the session of the general assembly during which 72
they were appointed, provided they continue to hold the office 73
of member of the general assembly. A vacancy on the board shall 74

H. B. No. 255 Page 4
As Introduced
be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. 75
Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but 76
shall be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses 77
incurred in the performance of official duties, payable from the 78
fund created in section 122.292 of the Revised Code. 79
(D) The board may appoint such employees as it considers 80
necessary to carry out its duties under this section. The 81
department of development shall provide office space and meeting 82
areas for the board. 83
(E) The board shall elect a chairperson at its first 84
meeting, and biannually thereafter. The board shall meet at the 85
call of its chairperson to conduct its official business. A 86
majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum. The 87
vote of at least nine members of the board is necessary for the 88
board to take any official action. 89
Sec. 122.972. The Ohio sports commission fund is created 90
in the state treasury consisting of money credited or 91
transferred to it and grants, gifts, and contributions made 92
directly to it. Money in the fund shall be used to defray costs 93
incurred by the Ohio sports commission in fulfilling its duties 94
under sections 122.29 and 122.291 of the Revised Code. 95